src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/cy/hyphenation/hyph_cy.dic
yrdd2y
yr1e
yr2e2i
yr5el.
yr2e2l
yr2en5d2
yrf3e
y2r2f
yr3f2f4
yr4fu
yrf5yd2
y4r1ia
yri2
yr3id
yr2l2
yr3ly
y2r2n3
yr1o
yr5ol.
yrol3
yr2s2
yr1w
yr5way
yr2w2a
yr1y
2ysa
ys1
ys3aw
2ys2b2
ysb5ïw
ys4bl
ysb3yd
ys2by
2yse2
ys5etl
ys2e2t
2ysf
4ysgar.
ys2g
ysg2ar
ys5gar1a2i
ysgar5a
ys5garasa
ys1ga2r1as1
ys5ga2r1ia
ysgar1i2
ys5gar3w2y
ysge4
ysgl4e
ysg2l
ysg5lw
ys4g2n
3ysg2r
ys4gy
2y2si
ys5ni.
ys2n3i
2yso
ys3od
4ysol1
ys5ol.
ys3ta
ys2t
4yste
yst5eb
ys5t1ed
ys3ter
ys4try
yst4w2
ys3u
2ysw
ys4we
y2s4wi
2ys3y
y2s4yg1
yt3ad
yt1e
yth3a
yt2h
yth3e
yth1i3e
yth1i2
yth3l2
yth3o
yth4re
yth2r
ythr5ec
yth3r5ed
ythr5es1
yth5re2u
ythr3o
yth5r2wb
yth4r5yc
yth5ur1
yth2u
yth3w
yth3yn
yt5ir3o
y2t1i
ytir1
yt3o
ytr2
yt3r1as1
yt3s2
ytw5ad
ytw2
yt2wa
yt3wy
yt5ysa
ytys1
2yw
yw4ae
y2wa
y3w4ait
yw1a2i
y1w2c
y3wedd
y5wedd1ia
y4wed2d1i
yw5eg.
ywe2g1
y4w2e2l
yw5en.
y2w3es1
yw1g2
y4w1ia
y2wi
yw3id
y4w1io
y4wir.
ywir3
y1wn1
yw3ol1
y2w1o
y2wr1
ywr4a
ywr5a2in
ywr1a2i
y4w1yc
y3w2yf1
ywy3na
ywy5ne
y1y
